New Jersey, session 221, A5956.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section, law enforcement officer means a member of any federal, State, county or municipal law enforcement agency, department, or division of those governments who is statutorily empowered to act for the detection, investigation, arrest, conviction, detention, or rehabilitation of persons violating the laws of this State or of the United States. b.  Except as provided in subsection c. of this section, a law enforcement officer shall not wear a mask or disguise while interacting with the public in the performance of the officers official duties. c.  Subsection b. of this section shall not be applicable to a law enforcement officer who is: (1)  engaged in an undercover assignment; (2)  wearing a shield that does not conceal the officers face to protect the officers face from harm; (3)  wearing a medical grade mask or N95 respirator designed to prevent the transmission of disease and has obtained a statement from a licensed physician that the mask or respirator is necessary to protect the health of the officer; or (4)  wearing a mask for protection against exposure to smoke during a State of Emergency. d.  A law enforcement officer who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a disorderly persons offense. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.